District of Columbia statutes.
50-1203

Entry of lien — Priority.

In the absence of agreement of all parties affected and in the absence of circumstances estopping a lienholder from insisting upon such rights, lien shall be entered on the certificate by the Recorder and shall have priority among themselves in the following order:

(1)

If the motor vehicle or trailer has been previously titled or registered in this or some other jurisdiction, unsatisfied liens shown by the previous certificate, title, registry, or proof of ownership shall be entered in the order in which they appear on such previous certificate, title, registry, or proof of ownership.

(2)

Liens for which instruments are presented with the application for the certificate.

(3)

Liens, where the instruments are presented for recording, together with the certificate, irrespective of the fact that 1 or more instruments not entered on the certificate may have been previously presented for recording without such certificate.

(4)

As between 2 or more instruments presented for recording without the certificate, the one first presented for recording shall have priority.

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 737, ch. 527, § 3
This section is referenced in § 50-1209.
1981 Ed., § 40-1003.
1973 Ed., § 40-703.